District of Columbia statutes.
31-5515

Stay of proceedings; access to records.

(a)

All proceedings in which the insolvent insurer is a party or is obligated to defend a party in any court in the District of Columbia shall be stayed for 6 months, and any additional time thereafter as may be determined by the court, from the date the insolvency is determined or an ancillary proceeding is instituted in the District, whichever is later, to permit proper defense by the Association of all pending causes of action. As to any covered claims arising from a judgment under any decision, verdict, or finding based on the default of the insolvent insurer or its failure to defend an insured, the Association, either on its own behalf or on behalf of the insured, may apply to have the judgment, order, decision, verdict, or finding set aside by the same court or administrator that made the judgment, order, decision, verdict, or finding and shall be permitted to defend the claim on the merits.

(b)

The liquidator, receiver, or statutory successor of an insolvent insurer covered by this chapter shall permit access by the board of directors or its authorized representative, to any of the insolvent insurer’s records which are necessary for the board of directors in carrying out its functions under this chapter with regard to covered claims. In addition, the liquidator, receiver, or statutory successor shall provide the board of directors, or its representative, with copies of the records upon the request by the board and at the expense of the board.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-51, § 16, 40 DCR 6120
1981 Ed., § 35-3915.